Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 3 Committees
10-3-402. Purpose and definitions.

It is determined that adequate information is not available at each biennial session of the General Assembly through which the members of the General Assembly may determine the needs and legislative requirements of the various agencies, departments, or other entities of the state government and political subdivisions of the state and that the impartial periodic auditing of entities of the state and political subdivisions of the state will provide information which will facilitate the discharge by the General Assembly of its legislative responsibilities.

Due to time restraints and the size, complexity, and scope of the entities of the state and its political subdivisions, it is determined that the sixty-day legislative session is not an adequate time in which to audit entities of the state and political subdivisions of the state.

It is further determined that the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall exist and operate as a joint interim committee of the General Assembly and in such capacity shall serve the General Assembly as the proper agency to provide for the impartial auditing, independently of the executive branch of state government, of entities of the state and political subdivisions of the state.

It is not the intent of this act, nor shall this act be construed, to infringe upon or deprive the executive or judicial branches of state government of any rights, powers, or duties vested in or imposed upon them by the Constitution of Arkansas.

It is the intent of this act merely to provide the General Assembly with adequate information which will facilitate the exercise by it of its constitutional powers and none other.

For the purposes of this subchapter:

“Audit” means a financial audit, performance audit, information technology audit, review, report of agreed-upon procedures, compilation, examination, investigation, or other report or procedure approved by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee for an entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state;

“Entity of the state” means the State of Arkansas as a whole or any department, institution of higher education, board, commission, agency, or quasi-public organization, or any official, office, or employee, or any agency, instrumentality, or function thereof;

“Other funds” means any funds or assets held by a person, foundation, nonprofit corporation, or any other entity for the specific benefit of a particular entity or entities of the state or political subdivision of the state;

“Political subdivision of the state” means any county, municipality, school, quasi-public organization, district, official, office, employee, or any agency, instrumentality, or function thereof;

“Public funds” means any funds, moneys, receivables, grants, investments, instruments, real or personal property, or other assets, liabilities, equities, revenues, receipts, or disbursements belonging to, held by, or passed through an entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state; and

“School” means any public school district, charter school, or education service cooperative, or any publicly supported entity having supervision over public educational entities.

The definitions in this subchapter are limited to this subchapter only, and shall not be used or interpreted as applying to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment substituted “education service cooperative” for “educational cooperative” in (f)(6).

Meaning of “this act”. Acts 1955, No. 105, codified as §§10-3-401 —10-3-405,10-3-407 —10-3-409, and10-4-101 —10-4-116 [repealed].

Acts 2005, No. 2201, codified as §§10-3-402 —10-3-404,10-3-406,10-3-407,10-3-410,10-3-411,10-4-401 —10-4-427,14-77-102,16-21-1107 and16-21-2007.

Cross References. Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

The Senate shall select sixteen (16) members in accordance with procedures prescribed by the Rules of the Senate.

At the time of selecting members, the Senate shall also select in the same manner one (1) first alternate and one (1) second alternate for each member selected.

The first alternates shall also be nonvoting members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and shall be entitled to receive per diem and mileage for attending all meetings of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

First alternate members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall have a vote in matters before the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee if the regular member which the first alternate represents is not in attendance.

Second alternate members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall have a vote in matters before the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee if the regular member and first alternate member which the second alternate represents are not in attendance.

First alternate members attending as nonvoting members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall receive per diem and mileage to be paid in the same manner and from the same source as regular members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee;

The House of Representatives shall select twenty (20) members in accordance with the procedure prescribed by the Rules of the House of Representatives.

At the time of selecting members, the House shall also select in the same manner one (1) first alternate and one (1) second alternate for each member selected.

The first alternates shall also be nonvoting members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and shall be entitled to receive per diem and mileage for attending all meetings of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

First alternate members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall have a vote in matters before the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee if the regular member which the first alternate represents is not in attendance.

Second alternate members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall have a vote in matters before the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee if the regular member and first alternate member which the second alternate represents are not in attendance.

First alternate members attending as nonvoting members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall receive per diem and mileage to be paid in the same manner and from the same source as regular members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee; and

The Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the immediate past chair or cochairs of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, and the cochairs and co-vice chairs of the Legislative Council shall be ex officio members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and shall enjoy all the rights and privileges of other members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

If the immediate past House Cochair of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee is not a member of the House, the Speaker of the House of Representatives may appoint a member of the House to serve in the stead of the immediate past House cochair.

If the immediate past Senate Cochair of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee is not a member of the Senate, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate may appoint a member of the Senate to serve in the stead of the immediate past Senate cochair.

If the House Cochair of the Legislative Council has not been elected, the Speaker of the House of Representatives may appoint a member of the House to serve until the House members of the Legislative Council elect a cochair of the Legislative Council.

If the House Co-vice Chair of the Legislative Council has not been elected, the Speaker of the House of Representatives may appoint a member of the House to serve until the House members of the Legislative Council elect a co-vice chair of the Legislative Council.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1995, No. 1350 became law without the Governor's signature.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment added (a)(3)(D) and (E).

The 2009 amendment deleted former (b).

No member of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall be a regular member of the Legislative Council, but may be a first or second alternate member of the Legislative Council.

Tenure of membership and means of filling vacant positions for members of the House of Representatives shall be as prescribed by the Rules of the House of Representatives.

Tenure of membership and the means of filling vacant positions for members of the Senate shall be as prescribed by the Rules of the Senate.

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall meet upon call or announcement by either cochair or upon petition of ten (10) of the regular members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

(1)The official meeting place of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall be in that portion of the State Capitol Building assigned to the General Assembly by § 10-3-1105.

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee is authorized to meet and transact its normal business during all legislative sessions as provided in this section.

(1)If members of the House of Representatives and members of the Senate each have selected their respective cochairs for the new biennial period, either cochair may call a meeting of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee members during legislative sessions.

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall consist of the members of the General Assembly who served on the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee prior to the commencement of the current General Assembly.

If any regular member of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee is no longer serving in the General Assembly, then this vacancy shall be assumed by the first or second alternate as provided by law.

In the meetings, primary consideration shall be given to matters that require immediate attention and that cannot wait until the conclusion of the legislative session.

The duties of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall be to provide for the auditing of any entity of the state or political subdivision of the state for the purpose of furnishing the General Assembly with information vital to the discharge of its constitutional duties.

(1)Immediately after its organization, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall commence the performance of its duties herein prescribed.

The Senate cochair shall appoint all Senate Legislative Joint Auditing Committee members to subcommittees of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, and the House cochair shall appoint all House Legislative Joint Auditing Committee members to subcommittees of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

The Senate cochair shall appoint a Senate Legislative Joint Auditing Committee member as cochair of each of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee's subcommittees, and the House cochair shall appoint a House Legislative Joint Auditing Committee member as the cochair of each of the subcommittees of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

The Senate cochair and the House cochair shall alternate in presiding at meetings of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee unless the cochairs otherwise agree.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 105, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-704; Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 1; 2007, No. 617, § 36.

10-3-403. Members — Selection.

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall consist of members of the General Assembly to be selected as follows:

History.

Acts 1955, No. 105, §§ 2, 3; 1965, No. 411, § 1; 1967, No. 107, § 1; 1967, No. 147, §§ 1, 2; 1967, No. 353, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-617.1, 4-617.3, 4-702, 4-703; Acts 1987, No. 84, § 2; 1993, No. 542, § 2; 1995, No. 1350, § 3; 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10 § 18; 1997, No. 147, § 8; 2001, No. 288, § 2; 2001, No. 466, § 1; 2003, No. 1002, § 1; 2003, No. 1091, § 2; 2005, No. 2201, § 1; 2007, No. 321, § 2; 2009, No. 248, § 2.

10-3-404. Tenure — Vacancies — Alternates.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 105, §§ 2, 3; 1967, No. 147, §§ 1, 2; 1967, No. 353, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-702, 4-703; Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 5; 2005, No. 2201, § 1.

10-3-405. Meetings.

However, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee may meet at any other designated place it may deem necessary to the carrying out of its official business.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 105, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-705; Acts 2001, No. 466, § 2.

10-3-406. Meetings during legislative session.

(A)If members of the House and members of the Senate each have not selected their respective cochairs for the new biennial period, meetings of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee during the legislative session shall be called by either cochair of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, who shall be the person who served in this capacity prior to the commencement of the current General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 371, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-705.1 — 4-705.3; Acts 2001, No. 466, § 3; 2005, No. 2201, § 2.

10-3-407. Duties — Cochairs.

The Senate members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall select one (1) of their number as cochair and one (1) of their number as co-vice chair.

The House members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall select one (1) of their number as cochair and one (1) of their number as co-vice chair.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 105, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-704; Acts 2001, No. 466, § 4; 2005, No. 2201, § 3.

10-3-408. Rules.

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee may establish any rules as it may deem fit which are not inconsistent with law.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 105, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-706; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 744.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “Rules” in the section heading and following “rules” in the text.

10-3-409. Compensation of Legislative Auditor and employees — Cooperation with Council of State Governments — Reimbursement.

The Legislative Auditor shall be entitled to such salary as may be authorized by appropriation of the General Assembly.

All other employees of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall receive such remuneration as may be provided by the annual appropriations.

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee is authorized to cooperate with the Council of State Governments and with national and regional organizations established to study governmental problems and may authorize one (1) or more of its members to attend the meetings thereof which the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee deems appropriate. Any member of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee attending the meetings shall be reimbursed only for actual and reasonable expenses for transportation, meals, lodging, and other necessary expenses.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “annual” for “biennial” in (a)(2).

History.

Acts 1955, No. 105, § 7; 1963, No. 499, § 1; 1969, No. 139, § 2; 1975, No. 929, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-707; Acts 2015, No. 1150, § 3.

10-3-410. Abolishment or consolidation of agencies.

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee is authorized to recommend to the General Assembly the abolishment or consolidation of any entity of the state which the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee deems appropriate as a result of its review of audits performed by its staff.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 949, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-718; 2005, No. 2201, § 4.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1981, No. 949 became law without the Governor's signature.

10-3-411. Investigation and audit of state or local entities — Subpoenas — Contempt.

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee has the authority to conduct investigations or audits pertaining to the affairs of any entity of the state or political subdivision of the state whenever the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee determines that investigations are necessary to make a proper determination with respect to the operations of the entity of the state or political subdivision of the state or any agency or instrumentality of them, or of the collection, handling, administration, or expenditure of any public funds or assets allocated, received, managed, directed, handled, or disbursed by or on behalf of the entity.

In addition, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee has the authority to investigate documents, books, and records regarding receipt, expenditure, or disbursement of other funds if the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee or its executive committee determines that the investigation of the documents, books, and records is necessary to verify any audit of an entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state or to investigate misappropriation of other funds.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing or permitting the release of information prohibited by law or not subject to public inspection under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., or other applicable law.

(a)All records, documents, correspondence, or other data of a person, foundation, nonprofit corporation, or any other entity holding other funds that would infringe upon the rights, privacy, or confidentiality of donors of private funds to the person, foundation, nonprofit corporation, or other entity are exempt from public disclosure.

Any working papers or other data relating to the donor information examined by the Legislative Auditor under this chapter are confidential and exempt from public disclosure.

In connection with any investigations or audits, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee has the right and power to subpoena witnesses and to issue subpoenas duces tecum.

All subpoenas shall be issued by either cochair of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, or by either co-vice chair acting in the absence of either cochair, after the issuance of the subpoenas has been approved by a majority vote of the membership of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee at a duly called meeting with all members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee having received no fewer than six (6) days' advance notice of the meeting.

The reasons for, and purposes of, the proposed subpoena or subpoenas, including the names of the persons or the nature and identification of all books, records, and documents for which subpoenas are being considered, shall be furnished in writing to the members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee in the notice mailed to the members not less than six (6) days in advance of the meeting at which the question of issuing the subpoenas is to be considered.

No subpoenas shall be issued under the provisions of this section until such time as any individual or the individual holding the books, records, or documents sought by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee has received a formal written invitation to appear before the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee by certified registered mail at least thirty (30) days prior to a regular or special meeting of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that individual has failed or refused to appear before the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee at the meeting.

The cochairs and the co-vice chairs of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee are authorized to administer oaths.

Subpoenas issued by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall be served by the sheriff of the county in which the person, books, records, or documents subpoenaed are located.

The sheriff shall be entitled to the same fees for the service of process as provided by law for service of process issued by the circuit court.

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee at its option may direct the Division of Arkansas State Police to serve any subpoena.

Witnesses subpoenaed to appear before the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall be entitled to witness fees and travel allowances at the same rate as provided by law for witnesses subpoenaed to appear in civil actions in circuit court.

The fees for the serving of subpoenas and all witness fees and travel allowances shall be paid from funds appropriated for the maintenance and operation of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

If any person subpoenaed to appear before the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall fail to appear or to produce books, documents, or records subpoenaed by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, the fact shall be certified to the circuit court of the county in which the hearing is held.

The court shall punish the person for contempt of the General Assembly in the same manner as punishment for contempt is imposed for failure to respond to a subpoena or directive of the court.

It is the intent of this section to authorize the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee to:

Issue subpoenas;

Compel the attendance of witnesses;

Administer oaths when necessary; and

Make full investigations or determinations whenever the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee determines:

They are necessary with respect to the affairs of any entity of the state or political subdivision of the state; and

Investigations are necessary to discharge its duties.

It is not the intent of this section to repeal, reduce, or diminish the authority vested by law in the Legislative Auditor to issue subpoenas whenever the Legislative Auditor determines that they are necessary to assist the Legislative Auditor or the staff of the Legislative Auditor in making a complete audit.

This section shall be cumulative to Acts 1955, No. 105, and all laws amendatory to that act.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1955, No. 105, referred to in this section, is codified as §§10-3-401 —10-3-405,10-3-407 —10-3-409, and10-4-101 —10-4-116 [repealed].

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “the Division of Legislative Audit” in (b)(1).

Cross References. Contempt of court, §16-10-108.

Fees of sheriffs, §21-6-307.

Witness fees, §16-43-801.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the creation of the Federal Audit Subcommittee, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 466, § 7. The section was derived from Acts 1981, No. 988, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-719.

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning state agency requests for federal audits, were repealed by Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 6. They were derived from the following sources:

10-3-422. Acts 1981, No. 988, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-720.

10-3-423. Acts 1981, No. 988, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-721.

10-3-424. Acts 1981, No. 988, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-722.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 16, provided:

“Nothing in this act shall affect any statutorily created subcommittee of a joint interim committee.”

Effective Dates. Acts 1981, No. 939, § 3: became law without Governor's signature, Apr. 8, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that an enlarged Joint Budget Committee is necessary to provide for proper consideration of appropriation bills and budget proposals submitted for consideration by the General Assembly, and the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order that the Senate and the House of Representatives of the Seventy-Third General Assembly may select the members of the Joint Budget Committee to serve at the next following Regular Session of the General Assembly, and to authorize the members of the Joint Budget Committee to attend the pre-session budget hearings of the Legislative Council held prior to the convening of the Regular Session of the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 224, § 5: Feb. 28, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that important decisions affecting budgets vital to essential programs of government are yet to be dealt with by this Regular Session; that clarification of the membership of the Joint Budget Committee is essential to the efficient operation of said committee for the remainder of this 75th Session of the General Assembly, and at future legislative sessions, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to accomplish such clarification in order to expedite the business of this Regular Session of the General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 832, § 7: Mar. 27, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present composition of the Joint Budget Committee is in immediate need of change; this act so provides; and that this act shall go into effect immediately in order to change the membership of the Joint Budget Committee prior to the adjournment of this regular session. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 542, § 7: Mar. 16, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this act affects the method of selection of members of the House of Representatives to the Legislative Council, Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and the Joint Budget Committee; and that this act is immediately necessary to provide for the proper selection of such members during the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 1312, § 36: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, Sections 9 as added by House Amendment 1, 12 as added by House Amendment 4, and 15 through 19 as added by House Amendment 10 shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of passage and approval and the remainder of the act shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 24: Oct. 23, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the current law relating to the operation of interim committees of the General Assembly unduly restricts the interim work of the General Assembly by authorizing committees to meet only as joint committees of the House of Representatives and the Senate; that in order to enable the Senate and House of Representatives to efficiently and effectively perform their interim duties, it is necessary that the interim committees of each house be authorized to meet either jointly or separately and that this act should be given effect immediately to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 1285, § 32: Approved April 9, 1997: Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety Section 10 of this act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, Section 10 shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, Section 10 shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto. The remaining sections of this act shall become effective from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 221, § 7: Feb. 13, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that the current incremental line-item system of budgeting is ineffective in evaluating agency performance; that to implement a replacement system in a reasonable time is a difficult task and that to delay the implementation could cause the inability to meet critical deadlines. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 2100, § 22: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2005 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2005 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2005.”

(A)In connection with investigations or audits, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee has the authority to examine any or all books, records, or any other data or systems relative to the investigation or audit, confidential or otherwise, irrespective of the custodian or location of the records.

However, in the investigation of documents, books, and records regarding receipt, expenditure, or disbursement of other funds, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee or its executive committee must approve the Legislative Auditor's determination that the investigation of the documents, books, and records is necessary to verify any audit of an entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state or to investigate misappropriation of other funds.

(1)Any member of the General Assembly, by written request filed with the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee at least six (6) days prior to any regular or special meeting of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, may request an investigation or audit of any entity for which the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and Arkansas Legislative Audit has the authority to audit.

Upon the vote of the majority of the membership of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee approving the request, the Legislative Auditor shall conduct the investigation or audit.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 662, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-709, 4-709n; Acts 2001, No. 466, §§ 5, 6; 2005, No. 2201, § 5; 2015, No. 554, § 3.

10-3-412 — 10-3-420. [Reserved.]

10-3-422 — 10-3-424. [Repealed.]

10-3-501. Act supplemental.

This act is supplemental to the existing laws of this state pertaining to the selection of members of the Joint Budget Committee and shall modify only those portions of such laws or parts of laws as are specifically in conflict herewith.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 224, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-304.7.

Meaning of “this act”. Acts 1985, No. 224, codified as §§10-3-501 and10-3-502.

10-3-502. Membership.

The Joint Budget Committee shall consist of:

The current cochairs of the Legislative Council;

The immediate past cochairs of the Legislative Council;

The current cochairs of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee;

The immediate past cochairs of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee;

Twenty-four (24) members and eight (8) alternate members of the House of Representatives; and

Twenty-four (24) members of the Senate.

If the immediate past House Cochair of the Legislative Council is not a member of the House, the Speaker of the House of Representatives may appoint a member of the House to serve in the stead of the immediate past House cochair.

If the immediate past Senate Cochair of the Legislative Council is not a member of the Senate, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate may appoint a member of the Senate to serve in the stead of the immediate past Senate cochair.

If the immediate past House Cochair of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee is not a member of the House, the Speaker of the House of Representatives may appoint a member of the House to serve in the stead of the immediate past House cochair.

If the immediate past Senate Cochair of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee is not a member of the Senate, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate may appoint a member of the Senate to serve in the stead of the immediate past Senate cochair.

If the House Cochair of the Legislative Council has not been elected, the Speaker of the House of Representatives may appoint a member of the House to serve until the House members of the Legislative Council elect a cochair of the Legislative Council.

If the House Cochair of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee has not been elected, the Speaker of the House of Representatives may appoint a member of the House to serve until the House members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee elect a cochair of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

The Senate Vice Chair of the Joint Budget Committee shall be selected in the same manner as the Senate Vice Chair of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

The House shall select the members and their alternates in accordance with the procedure prescribed by the Rules of the House of Representatives.

The first alternate members shall also be nonvoting members of the Joint Budget Committee and shall be entitled to receive per diem and mileage for attending meetings of the Joint Budget Committee.

First alternate members of the Joint Budget Committee shall have a vote in matters before the Joint Budget Committee if a regular member whom the first alternate represents is not in attendance.

Second alternate members of the Joint Budget Committee shall have a vote in matters before the Joint Budget Committee if a regular member and a first alternate member whom the second alternate represents are not in attendance.

The Senate members of the Joint Budget Committee shall be selected in accordance with procedures prescribed by the Rules of the Senate.

One (1) Senate alternate member shall be selected from each congressional district.

Alternate members shall also be nonvoting members of the Joint Budget Committee and shall be entitled to receive per diem and mileage for attending meetings of the Joint Budget Committee.

First alternate members attending as nonvoting members of the Joint Budget Committee shall receive per diem and mileage to be paid in the same manner and from the same source as regular members of the Joint Budget Committee.

The chairs of the Personnel Subcommittee of the Legislative Council, the Review Subcommittee of the Legislative Council, the Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review Subcommittee of the Legislative Council, and the Claims Subcommittee of the Legislative Council shall serve as ex officio nonvoting members of the corresponding Joint Budget Committee subcommittees.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The version of this section as amended by Acts 1991, No. 295, § 1, was repealed by Acts 1993, No. 517, § 6. This section, as amended by Acts 1991, No. 295, § 1, read as follows:

“In each biennial session of the General Assembly there shall be a Joint Budget Committee of the General Assembly which shall be composed of twenty-four (24) members, twelve (12) of whom shall be members of the Arkansas Senate and twelve (12) of whom shall be members of the House of Representatives. There shall be one (1) alternate member for each member. The Senate members and the House members and their alternates shall be selected in the manner provided in §§10-3-503 and10-3-504.”

Amendments. The 2007 amendment added (a)(1)(F) and (G).

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning Senate members and House members of the Joint Budget Committee and the Speaker-designate of the House of Representatives, were repealed by Acts 1993, No. 517, § 6. They were derived from the following sources:

10-3-503. Acts 1985, No. 224, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-304.6; Acts 1991, No. 295, § 4.